Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 9
COMMUNITY NOTIFICATION CONCERNING
SEXUALLY VIOLENT PREDATORS

16-13-901. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that persons who are convicted of offenses involving unlawful sexual behavior and who are identified as sexually violent predators pose a high enough level of risk to the community that persons in the community should receive notification concerning the identity of these sexually violent predators. The general assembly also recognizes the high potential for vigilantism that often results from community notification and the dangerous potential that the fear of such vigilantism will drive a sex offender to disappear and attempt to live without supervision. The general assembly therefore finds that sex offender notification should only occur in cases involving a high degree of risk to the community and should only occur under carefully controlled circumstances that include providing additional information and education to the community concerning supervision and treatment of sex offenders.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1151, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1311, § 1, effective May 30.

16-13-902. Definitions.

As used in this part 9, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of corrections created in section 24-1-128.5, C.R.S.

"Management board" means the sex offender management board created in section 16-11.7-103.

"Parole board" means the state board of parole created in section 17-2-201, C.R.S.

"Sex offender" means a person sentenced pursuant to part 10 of article 1.3 of title 18, C.R.S.

"Sexually violent predator" means a sex offender who is identified as a sexually violent predator pursuant to section 18-3-414.5, C.R.S., or who is found to be a sexually violent predator or its equivalent in any other state or jurisdiction, including but not limited to a military or federal jurisdiction. For purposes of this subsection (5), "equivalent", with respect to an offender found to be a sexually violent predator or its equivalent, means a sex offender convicted in another state or jurisdiction, including but not limited to a military, tribal, territorial, or federal jurisdiction, who has been assessed or labeled at the highest registration and notification levels in the jurisdiction where the conviction was entered and who satisfies the age, date of offense, and conviction requirements for sexually violent predator status pursuant to Colorado law.

"Technical assistance team" means the group of persons established by the division of criminal justice pursuant to section 16-13-906 to assist local law enforcement in carrying out community notification and to provide general community education concerning sex offenders.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1152, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(5) amended, p. 1311, § 2, effective May 30.

L. 2011:

(5) amended, (HB 11-1278), ch. 224, p. 959, § 1, effective May 27.

16-13-903. Sexually violent predator subject to community notification - determination - implementation.

A sexually violent predator shall be subject to community notification as provided in this part 9, pursuant to criteria, protocols, and procedures established by the management board pursuant to section 16-13-904.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 1312, § 3, effective May 30, 2006.)

When a sexually violent predator is sentenced to probation or community corrections or is released into the community following incarceration, the sexually violent predator's supervising officer, or the official in charge of the releasing facility or his or her designee if there is no supervising officer, shall notify the local law enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which the sexually violent predator resides or plans to reside upon release from incarceration. The local law enforcement agency shall notify the Colorado bureau of investigation, and the sexually violent predator's status as being subject to community notification shall be entered in the central registry of persons required to register as sex offenders created pursuant to section 16-22-110.

When a sexually violent predator living in a community changes residence, upon registration in the new community or notification to the new community's law enforcement agency, that agency shall notify the Colorado bureau of investigation and implement community notification protocols.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or limit the sovereign immunity granted to public entities pursuant to the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

A sex offender convicted in another jurisdiction who is designated as a sexually violent predator by the department of public safety for purposes of Colorado law shall be notified of his or her designation and shall have the right to appeal the designation in district court.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1152, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1185, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1312, § 3, effective May 30.

L. 2011:

(5) added, (HB 11-1278), ch. 224, p. 959, § 2, effective May 27.

16-13-904. Sex offender management board - duties.

The management board, in collaboration with the department of corrections, the judicial department, and the parole board, shall establish and revise when necessary:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 1312, § 4, effective May 30, 2006.)

Criteria to be applied by a local law enforcement agency in determining when to carry out a community notification;

Protocols and procedures for carrying out community notification.

The management board shall collaborate with the technical assistance team in establishing the protocols and procedures for carrying out community notification. Such protocols and procedures shall be designed to ensure that notice is provided in a manner that is as specific as possible to the population within the community that is at risk. Such protocols and procedures shall also include provision to the community of general information and education concerning sex offenders, including treatment and supervision of sex offenders, and procedures to attempt to minimize the risk of vigilantism.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 1312, § 4, effective May 30, 2006.)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1153, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) amended, p. 924, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (3) amended, p. 1312, § 4, effective May 30.

16-13-905. Local law enforcement - duties - immunity.

The local law enforcement agency for the jurisdiction in which a sexually violent predator who is subject to community notification resides shall be responsible for carrying out any community notification regarding said sexually violent predator. Such community notification shall only occur under the circumstances and in the manner specified by the management board pursuant to section 16-13-904. The local law enforcement agency may apply to the division of criminal justice for assistance from the technical assistance team in carrying out any community notification.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or limit the sovereign immunity granted to public entities pursuant to the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1154, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1313, § 5, effective May 30.

16-13-906. Division of criminal justice - technical assistance team.

The division of criminal justice of the department of public safety shall establish a technical assistance team to provide assistance to local law enforcement agencies in carrying out community notification. The technical assistance team shall include persons with expertise in sex offender management, sex offender supervision, and law enforcement.

The technical assistance team shall also be available upon request to assist communities in providing general information concerning sex offenders, including treatment, management, and supervision of sex offenders within society. Such education may be provided in situations that are not related to the provision of notice concerning a specific sexually violent predator.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or limit the sovereign immunity granted to public entities pursuant to the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 1154, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3) added, p. 924, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 1313, § 6, effective May 30.